Massachusetts, session 194th, H3257.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5 of Chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following:-
Fifty-ninth, Real estate, to the amount of one thousand dollars of the taxable valuation of
real estate of a person with minor children, including adopted children, for each child enrolled in
a private school in which the person pays a tuition, as provided in section 7 of chapter 76;
provided that such real estate is owned and occupied by the person as their domicile; provided
further a person seeking abatement shall annually furnish to the assessors of the city or town
proof of the child’s enrollment in such school
of 1